Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
ADMINISTRATIVE REMEDIES

[§657D-51] Transfers to take advantage of
chapter. Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter to the contrary,
the court shall enter such lawful judgment or order, in any proceeding to
enforce a civil right, where the court is satisfied that any interest,
property, or contract, since July 1, 1994, has been transferred or acquired
with intent to delay the just enforcement of such right by taking advantage of
this chapter. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Revision Note

"July 1, 1994" substituted for "the effective
date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next